src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-A-isttoana_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - isttoána - ok : # -m animate noun, knife AEW NA1
     isttoána+NA+Sg: isttoána
     isttoána+NA+Pl: isttoáíksi
     isttoána+NA+Obv: isttoáni
     isttoána+NA+Non: isttoání
     
     isttoána+NA+Px1Sg+Sg: nottoána
     isttoána+NA+Px1Sg+Pl: nottoáíksi
     isttoána+NA+Px1Sg+Obv: nottoáni
     isttoána+NA+Px1Sg+Non: nottoání

     isttoána+NA+Px1Pl+Sg: nottoánnaana
     isttoána+NA+Px1Pl+Pl: nottoánnaaniksi
     isttoána+NA+Px1Pl+Obv: nottoánnaani
     isttoána+NA+Px1Pl+Non: nottoánnaani

     isttoána+NA+Px21Pl+Sg: kottoánnoona
     isttoána+NA+Px21Pl+Pl: kottoánnooniksi
     isttoána+NA+Px21Pl+Obv: kottoánnooni
     isttoána+NA+Px21Pl+Non: kottoánnooni

     isttoána+NA+Px2Sg+Sg: kottoána
     isttoána+NA+Px2Sg+Pl: kottoáíksi
     isttoána+NA+Px2Sg+Obv: kottoáni
     isttoána+NA+Px2Sg+Non: kottoání

     isttoána+NA+Px2Pl+Sg: kottoánoaawa
     isttoána+NA+Px2Pl+Pl: kottoánoaawaiksi
     isttoána+NA+Px2Pl+Obv: kottoánoaawayi
     isttoána+NA+Px2Pl+Non: kottoánoaawai

     isttoána+NA+Px3Sg+Pl: ottoáíksi
     isttoána+NA+Px3Sg+Obv: ottoáni
     isttoána+NA+Px3Sg+Non: ottoání

     isttoána+NA+Px3Pl+Pl: ottoánoaawaiksi
     isttoána+NA+Px3Pl+Obv: ottoánoaawayi
     isttoána+NA+Px3Pl+Non: ottoánoaawai

     
